Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.030

Respiratory care practitioner—What constitutes.

A respiratory care practitioner is a person who adopts or uses any title or any description of services which incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: (1) RT, (2) RCP, (3) respiratory care practitioner, (4) respiratory therapist, (5) respiratory technician, (6) inhalation therapist, or (7) any other words, abbreviation, or insignia indicating that he or she is a respiratory care practitioner.

[ 1987 c 415 s 4.]